Utah statutes.
31A-33-116.   Dividends.
The board may declare a dividend to policyholders if it determines that a
surplus exists in the Injury Fund at the end of a fiscal period after the
payment of all claims, administrative costs, and the establishment of
appropriate reserves for future liabilities.  In making this determination,
the board shall require a certified audit and actuarial report of the
financial condition of the Injury Fund.  The board shall establish uniform
eligibility requirements for such dividends.  In determining the amount of
dividend to be paid to policyholders, the board may establish a procedure
which takes into consideration the claims loss experience of policyholders as
an incentive to encourage safe working conditions for employees.  The Workers'
Compensation Fund may use dividends to offset amounts due or owing by
policyholders or former policyholders.
